Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB461.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Commonwealth Funding Safety and Transparency Act.Section 2. Transparency.(a) Prohibition.--A nonprofit agency or any subcontractor or service provider of the nonprofit agency that receives funding from the Commonwealth to promote childbirth and provide alternatives to abortion may not provide false or misleading information in the provision of or advertisement of services.(b) Compliance.--Advertising that uses money provided by the Commonwealth:(1) Must comply with the act of December 20, 2015 (P.L.497, No.90), known as the Taxpayer-Funded Advertising 12345678910111213141516 Transparency Act.(2) May not provide false or misleading information.(c) Duties of nonprofit agencies.--A nonprofit agency shall ensure that its subcontractors and service providers that administer health care services, including pregnancy tests, counseling and postdelivery support:(1) Meet the requirements of the patient safety provisions of section 315 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act.(2) Comply with the same regulations as apply to a health care facility subject to section 806(h) of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.(3) Do not provide false or misleading information in the provision of or advertisement of services.(d) Health care services.--Health care services, including pregnancy tests, counseling and postdelivery support, provided by a nonprofit agency and its subcontractors and service providers, must comply with the nationally recognized standards published by the American Medical Association and the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.(e) Program training and materials.--Program training and materials from a nonprofit agency and its subcontractors and service providers must include the full range of contraceptive options approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.Section 3. Violations.A nonprofit agency that fails to comply with this act shall not be eligible to receive State funding or State tax 20250HB0461PN0469 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incentives.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0461PN0469 - 3 - 123